Arkansas, session 2025, SB345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas is known as the Natural State because of its
natural beauty and abundant outdoor recreational opportunities;
(2)(A) Arkansas has been consistently recognized as one of the
top places in the United States to live and in a recent annual study as the
most popular state to move to in 2024;
(B) Respondents in the study cited job opportunities and
affordability as the respondents' primary motivators to move to Arkansas;
(3) As a state, Arkansas can recruit sought-after amenities,
including major restaurant chains that Arkansans express desire in their
*CRH192*
03-13-2025 10:18:01 CRH192

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 SB345
communities to promote continued growth and economic development;
(4) Arkansas can recruit and attract hotels, large-event
facilities, and restaurants by eliminating the requirement to establish a
nonprofit corporation to obtain a private club permit; and
(5) The requirement to establish a nonprofit corporation to
obtain a private club permit is overly burdensome and results in the
necessity of filing multiple tax returns and other business filings for each
business location in the same corporation.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 3-9-202(14), concerning the definition of
"private club", is amended to read as follows:
(14)(A)(i) “Private club” means, except as provided in
subdivision (14)(D) of this section, a nonprofit corporation organized and
existing under the laws of this state, no part of the net revenues of which
shall inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any of its members or
any other individual, except for the payment of bona fide expenses of the
club's operations, and which is conducted for some common recreational,
social, patriotic, political, national, benevolent, athletic, community
hospitality, professional association, entertainment, or other nonprofit
object or purpose other than the consumption of alcoholic beverages.
(ii) The nonprofit corporation shall have been in
existence for a period of not less than one (1) year before applying for a
permit, as prescribed in this subchapter.
(iii) At the time of application for the permit, the
nonprofit corporation must have not fewer than one hundred (100) members and
at the time of application must own or lease, be the holder of a buy-sell
agreement or offer and acceptance, or have an option to lease a building,
property, or space therein for the reasonable comfort and accommodation of
its members and their families and guests and restrict the use of club
facilities to those persons.
(B) For purposes of this subdivision (14), a person shall
be required to become a member of the private club in any wet area of the
state only upon ordering an alcoholic beverage as defined under subdivision
(1) of this section.
(C) Furthermore, where the business entity that holds a
private club permit additionally holds a retail beer permit, retail wine for
03-13-2025 10:18:01 CRH192

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 SB345
consumption on the premises permit, or cafe or restaurant wine permit, the
hours of operation authorized for the private club shall likewise apply to
all permits of the business entity.
(D) A corporation, partnership, individual, or limited
liability company applying for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit under § 3-9-221(a)(3)(B) is not required to form a
nonprofit corporation but shall otherwise comply with all requirements of §
3-9-240;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 3-9-221(a)(3)(B)-(E), concerning counties
or parts of counties that have not approved the retail sale of intoxicating
liquors but are involved in tourism and promotion of economic development,
are amended to read as follows:
(B) To ensure that tourism and large-event facilities as
well as other associated activities are allowed to exist to promote the
economic development in the state, a new hotel, restaurant, or large-event
facility private club permit, for use in those places where the public retail
sale of intoxicating liquors is not authorized, should be created.
(C) These permits are necessary so that persons visiting
hotels, restaurants, or large-event facilities in these areas will be able to
enjoy the amenities that a person might find in other states.
(D) This additional permit will enhance the experience of
going to hotels, restaurants, or large-event facilities that may display
items of historic interest, contain extensive art collections, or host
musical or dramatic presentations.
(E)(i) Further, since the counties or parts of counties in
which these hotels, restaurants, or large-event facilities will be located do
not allow the open public retail sale of intoxicating liquors, the nonprofit
corporations that have been established to have the hotel facilities,
restaurants, or the large-event facilities should be allowed to offer
alcoholic beverages to members of the nonprofit corporations and their
guests.
(ii) These nonprofit corporations have been
established for the purpose of operating a qualifying hotel or large-event
facility private club or other mutual purposes, not for pecuniary gain, but
for their mutual convenience and to provide for the preparation and serving
03-13-2025 10:18:01 CRH192

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 SB345
to the members and their guests alcoholic beverages owned by the members
individually or in common under a locker, pool, or revolving fund system.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 3-9-222(c)(3)(A), concerning the contents
of the notice required to be published by an applicant for a private club
permit, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The notice shall give the names of the managing agent and
the nonprofit corporation or, in the case of a bed and breakfast private
club, the name of the business owner, and shall state:
(A) That the manager, or in the case of a bed and
breakfast private club or a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club, the owner, at least one (1) partner, or the majority
stockholder is a citizen of Arkansas;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 3-9-240 is amended to read as follows:
3-9-240. Hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit.
(a)(1) An application for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit shall be in writing and shall provide information
concerning the applicant for the hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit and the premises to be used by the applicant as the
Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division requires.
(2) A hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit may be issued only in a county or a territory of a county that does
not allow the public retail sale of intoxicating liquors as provided under §
3-8-201.
(3) A hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit may be issued to a corporation, partnership, individual, or limited
liability company.
(b) The application for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit shall be accompanied by a check or money order for the
amount required by this section for the hotel, restaurant, or large-event
facility private club permit.
(c) A hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club permit
application shall contain a description of the premises permitted and provide
proof that the space leased has at least:
03-13-2025 10:18:01 CRH192

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 SB345
(1) Eighty (80) lodging rooms and five thousand square feet
(5,000 sq. ft.) of public meeting, banquet, or restaurant space from a hotel;
or
(2) Ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq. ft.) of interior or
exterior public meeting, banquet, exhibit hall, or restaurant space from a
large-event facility; or
(3) Seating capacity for not fewer than one hundred (100) people
in the restaurant that otherwise complies with the requirements of § 3-9-
202(16).
(d) If the director grants an application for a hotel, restaurant, or
large-event facility private club permit, he or she shall issue a hotel,
restaurant, or large-event facility private club permit in a form as
determined by the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.
(e)(1) A hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit authorizes the dispensing, service, and consumption of alcoholic
beverages by and to members and their guests on the premises of a hotel,
restaurant, or large-event facility private club permittee for on-premises
consumption at a hotel or large-event facility leased to a hotel or large-
event facility private club permittee.
(2) The areas of a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
that may be leased to utilized by a hotel, restaurant, or large-event
facility private club permittee for purposes of a hotel, restaurant, or
large-event facility private club permit include without limitation:
(A) Sleeping rooms;
(B) Pool-side bars;
(C) Banquet facilities;
(D) Restaurants;
(E) Lobbies;
(F) Exhibit halls;
(G) Patios; and
(H) Outdoor gardens.
(3) Members Guests of the hotel or large-event facility private
club permittee that holds a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit may move from one area to another area designated under
subdivision (e)(2) of this section while consuming alcoholic beverages.
(f)(1) A hotel or large-event facility that leases all or a portion of
03-13-2025 10:18:01 CRH192

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 SB345
its premises to a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee shall
clearly identify the areas of the hotel or large-event facility that are
leased to the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee.
(2)(A) Areas leased by a hotel or large-event facility private
club permittee that contain articles of historic interest or art or dramatic
or musical presentations shall be open to members of the hotel or large-event
facility private club permittee and to nonmembers of the hotel or large-event
facility private club permittee.
(B) However, a A person must be a member or the guest of a
member of the hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permittee to consume or possess alcoholic beverages dispensed by the hotel,
restaurant, or large-event facility private club permittee.
(3)(2) Persons under twenty-one (21) years of age may be allowed
on the premises of the hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private
club permittee.
(4)(A)(3)(A) A hotel holding a hotel, restaurant, or large-event
facility private club permit under this section may lease a sleeping room to
a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee for the service of
alcoholic beverages.
(B) The hotel holding a hotel or large-event facility
private club permit may use room service to serve the alcoholic beverage.
(C)(B) The hotel holding a hotel, restaurant, or large-
event facility private club permit may stock the leased a sleeping room with
alcoholic beverages, and the hotel or large-event facility private club
permittee through the hotel's employees shall inventory the alcoholic
beverages in the leased sleeping room.
(D)(C) Sleeping rooms that are solely occupied by persons
twenty (20) years of age and under shall not receive alcoholic beverages
through room service or be stocked with alcoholic beverages.
(5) A hotel or large-event facility that leases space to a hotel
or large-event facility private club permittee shall provide a means of
entering the hotel or large-event facility to allow a person to knowingly
decide if he or she would like to become a member of the hotel or large-event
facility private club permittee.
(g)(1) A hotel leasing its premises to a hotel or large-event facility
private club permittee may include a membership application to the hotel or
03-13-2025 10:18:01 CRH192

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 SB345
large-event facility private club permittee as part of its registration
materials.
(2) A guest of a hotel becoming a member of the hotel or large-
event facility private club permittee shall receive a membership card.
(3) A hotel that includes a membership application to the hotel
or large-event facility private club permittee as part of its registration
materials shall retain the registration materials as required by the
division.
(4) A hotel or large-event facility private club permittee may
refuse a membership or revoke a membership of a person that does not abide by
the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee rules.
(h)(1)(A)(g)(1)(A) For a hotel and a restaurant, the application and
renewal fee for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit is one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per year payable on or
before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.
(B) In an area in which the sale of intoxicating liquor
has not been authorized by local option as provided under § 3-8-201 et seq.,
the application for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit shall be accompanied by an additional application fee of one thousand
five hundred dollars ($1,500).
(2) The application and renewal fee for a large-event facility
for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club permit is two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per year payable on or before June 30
of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.
(i)(h) The director shall promulgate rules to enforce this section.

/s/Irvin









03-13-2025 10:18:01 CRH192